Washington statutes.
RCW 26.38.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child" means an unemancipated individual under 18 years of age.

(2) "Child-placing agency" means a person with authority under chapter 74.15 RCW to identify or place a child for adoption. "Child-placing agency" does not include a parent of the child.

(3) "Custody" has the same meaning as "physical custody" as defined in RCW 26.27.021.

(4) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) "Guardian" means a person recognized as a legal guardian under RCW 26.33.020 or under chapter 11.130 RCW.

(6) "Intercountry adoption" means an adoption or placement for adoption of a child who resides in a foreign country at the time of adoption or placement. "Intercountry adoption" includes an adoption finalized in the child's country of residence or in a state.

(7) "Intermediary" means a person that assists or facilitates a transfer of custody of a child, whether or not for compensation.

(8) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010.

(9) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(10) "Record" means information:

(a) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(b) Stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form.

(11) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. "State" includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.

[ 2022 c 88 s 102.]